Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.515

Fish and wildlife officers—Application of chapter.

(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter applies to the state with respect to fish and wildlife officers except the state may not negotiate any matters relating to retirement benefits or health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits.

(2) For the purposes of negotiating wages, wage-related matters, and nonwage matters, the state shall be represented by the governor or the governor's designee who is appointed under RCW 41.80.010, and costs of the negotiations under this section shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 41.80.140.

(3) Fish and wildlife officers shall be excluded from the coalition bargaining for a master agreement of all exclusive bargaining representatives of fewer than five hundred employees under chapter 41.80 RCW.

(4) The governor or the governor's designee shall consult with the director of fish and wildlife regarding collective bargaining.

(5) The negotiation of provisions pertaining to wages and wage-related matters in a collective bargaining agreement between the state and the bargaining representatives of the fish and wildlife officers is subject to the following:

(a) The state's bargaining representative must periodically consult with the committee of the joint committee on employment relations created in RCW 41.80.007 or any such successor committee for the joint committee on employment relations; and

(b) Provisions that are entered into before the legislature approves the funds necessary to implement the provisions are conditioned upon the legislature's subsequent approval of the funds.

(6) The governor shall submit a request for funds necessary to implement the wage and wage-related matters in the collective bargaining agreement or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement. Requests for funds necessary to implement the provisions of bargaining agreements may not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:

(a) Have been submitted to the director of financial management by October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and

(b) Have been certified by the director of financial management as being feasible financially for the state or reflects the decision of an arbitration panel reached under RCW 41.56.475.

[ 2020 c 298 s 2.]